Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1337.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 49-439, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE49-439. Decisions on petitions for conditional order; terms and conditions A. Within thirty days after the conclusion of the hearing held pursuant to section 49-438, subsection B, or, if no hearing is held, within sixty days after the filing of the petition, the director shall deny the petition or grant the petition on such terms and conditions as the director deems appropriate. B. The terms and conditions which that are imposed as a condition to the granting or the continued existence of a conditional order shall include, but not be limited to: 1. A detailed plan for completion of corrective steps needed to conform to the provisions of this article, the rules adopted pursuant to this article,  and the requirements of the permit issued pursuant to this article. 2. A requirement that necessary construction shall begin as expeditiously as practicable. 3. Such written reports as may be required. 4. The right to make periodic inspection of the facilities for which the conditional order is granted. C. A reasonable fee as may be prescribed by the director shall be deposited in the air pollution control permit administration fund established in section 49-555 49-455. END_STATUTE